Utah statutes.
4-10-11.   Stop sale, use, or removal order authorized -- Conditions for
release specified -- Condemnation or seizure -- Procedure specified -- Award
of costs authorized.
(1) The department may issue a "stop sale, use, or removal order" to any
manufacturer, repairer, wholesaler, or retailer of any designated article or
articles which it finds or has reason to believe violates this chapter. The
order shall be in writing and no article subject to it shall be removed,
offered, or exposed for sale, except upon subsequent written release by the
department. Before a release is issued, the department may require the
manufacturer, repairer, wholesaler, or retailer of the "stopped" article to
pay the expense incurred by the department in connection with the withdrawal
of the article from the market.
(2)  The department is authorized in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek
an order of seizure or condemnation of any article which violates this chapter
or, upon proper grounds, to obtain a temporary restraining order or permanent
injunction to prevent violation of this chapter. No bond shall be required of
the department in an injunctive proceeding brought under this section.
(3)  If condemnation is ordered, the article shall be disposed of as the court
directs; provided, that in no event shall it order condemnation without giving
the claimant of the article an opportunity to apply to the court for
permission to bring the article into conformance, or for permission to remove
it from the state.
(4)  If the court orders condemnation, court costs, fees, storage, and other
costs shall be awarded against the claimant of the article.
